Hawaii statutes.
§671-19 Duty to cooperate; assessment of
costs and fees. [(a)] It shall be the duty of every person who files an
inquiry with the medical inquiry and conciliation panel, every health care
provider against whom the inquiry is made, and every insurance carrier or other
person providing medical tort liability insurance for the health care provider,
to cooperate with the medical inquiry and conciliation panel and meaningfully
participate in panel proceedings for the purpose of achieving a prompt, fair,
and just resolution, disposition, or settlement of the inquiry, provided that
cooperation and participation shall not prejudice the substantive rights of
those persons.

[(b)] Any party may apply to the panel to have
the costs of the action assessed against any party for failure to cooperate
with the panel or meaningfully participate in panel proceedings. The panel may
award costs, or a portion thereof, including attorney's fees, witness fees
including those of expert witnesses, filing fees, and costs of the medical
inquiry and conciliation panel proceedings to the party applying therefor.

[(c)] In determining whether any person has
failed to cooperate or meaningfully participate in good faith, the panel shall
consider, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The attendance of the persons at proceedings of
the medical inquiry and conciliation panel;

(2) The extent to which representatives of parties
and counsel representing parties came to panel proceedings with knowledge of
the claims and defenses and authority to negotiate a settlement or other
disposition of the matter;

(3) The testimony of members of the panel as to the
facts of the person's participation in the panel proceeding;

(4) The extent of the person's cooperation in
providing the panel with documents and testimony called for by the panel;

(5) The reasons advanced by the person so charged for
not fully cooperating, participating, or negotiating; and

(6) The failure of the person to submit any required
fees to the department of commerce and consumer affairs, as required by this
chapter.

[(d)] The party against whom costs are awarded
may appeal the award to the circuit court. The court may affirm or remand the
case with instructions for further proceedings; or it may reverse or modify the
award if the substantial rights of the petitioners may have been prejudiced
because the award is characterized as abuse of discretion. [L 1976, c 219, pt
of §2; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1993, c 95, §1; am L
1995, c 213, §3; am L 2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next